North Carolina statutes. Chapter 153A. Counties.
Article 3. Boundaries.

§ 153A-17.
Existing boundaries.

The boundaries of each county shall remain as presently established, until changed in accordance with law.

History.

1973, c. 822, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Alamance and Guilford Counties: 2018-61, ss. 1-11; Wake, Chatham, and Harnett Counties: 2018-62, ss. 1-8.

§ 153A-18.
Uncertain or disputed boundary.

If two or more counties are uncertain as to the exact location of the boundary between them, the North Carolina Geodetic Survey (NCGS), on a cooperative basis, shall assist counties in defining and monumenting the location of the uncertain or disputed boundary as established in accordance with law. Upon receiving written request from all counties adjacent to the uncertain or disputed boundary, the NCGS may cause the boundary to be surveyed, marked, and mapped. The counties may appoint special commissioners to supervise the surveying, marking, and mapping. A commissioner so appointed or a person surveying or marking the boundary may enter upon private property to view and survey the boundary or to erect boundary markers. Upon ratification of the survey by the board of commissioners of each county, a map showing the surveyed boundary shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of each county in the manner provided by law for the recordation of maps or plats and in the Secretary of State’s office. The map shall contain a reference to the date of each resolution of ratification and to the page in the minutes of each board of commissioners where the resolution may be found. Upon recordation, the map is conclusive as to the location of the boundary. Upon reestablishing all, or some portion, of a county boundary, and if after the NCGS submits the results of the survey to the requesting counties, and the requesting counties have not ratified the reestablished boundary within one year of receiving the (map) survey plat denoting the location of the reestablished boundary, the survey plat will become conclusive as to the location of the boundary and will be recorded in the Register of Deeds in each affected county and in the Secretary of State’s office. The Chief of the NCGS (State Surveyor) will notify each affected party in writing of the action taken. As used in this subsection, an “affected party” means both (i) the governing body of a county that the reestablished boundary denotes the extent of its jurisdiction and (ii) a property owner whose real property has been placed in whole or in part in another county due to the reestablished boundary.

If two or more counties dispute the exact location of the boundary between them, and the dispute cannot be resolved pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, any of the counties may apply to a superior court judge who has jurisdiction pursuant to

G.S. 7A-47.1

or 7A-48 in any of the districts or sets of districts as defined in

G.S. 7A-41.1

in which any of the counties is located for appointment of a boundary commission. The application shall identify the disputed boundary and ask that a boundary commission be appointed. Upon receiving the application, the court shall set a date for a hearing on whether to appoint the commission. The court shall cause notice of the hearing to be served on the other county or counties. If, after the hearing, the court finds that the location of the boundary is disputed, it shall appoint a boundary commission.The commission shall consist of one resident of each disputing county and a resident of some other county. The court may appoint one or more surveyors to assist the commission. The commission shall locate, survey, and map and may mark the disputed boundary. To do so it may take evidence and hear testimony, and any commissioner and any person surveying or marking the boundary may enter upon private property to view and survey the boundary or to erect boundary markers. Within 45 days after the day it is appointed, unless this time is extended by the court, the commission shall make its report (which shall include a map of the surveyed boundary) to the court. To be sufficient, the report must be concurred in by a majority of the commissioners. If the court is satisfied that the commissioners have made no error of law, it shall ratify the report, after which the map shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds of each county in the manner provided by law for the recordation of maps or plats and in the Secretary of State’s office. Upon recordation, the map is conclusive as to the location of the boundary.The disputing counties shall divide equally the costs of locating, surveying, marking, and mapping the boundary, unless the court finds that an equal division of the costs would be unjust. In that case the court may determine the division of costs.

Two or more counties may establish the boundary between them pursuant to subsection (a) of this section. Those boundaries are defined by natural monuments such as rivers, streams, and ridgelines. The use of base maps prepared from orthophotography may be used if said natural monuments are visible, which base maps show the monuments of the National Geodetic Survey and North Carolina Coordinate System established pursuant to Chapter 102 of the General Statutes. The orthophotography shall be prepared in compliance with the State’s adopted orthophotography standard. Upon ratification of the location of the boundary determined from orthophotography by the board of commissioners of each county, the map showing the boundary and the monuments of the National Geodetic Survey and North Carolina Coordinate System shall be recorded in the Office of the Register of Deeds of each county and in the Secretary of State’s office. The map shall contain a reference to the date of each resolution of ratification and to the page in the minutes of each board of commissioners where the resolution may be found. Upon recordation, the map is conclusive as to the location of the boundary.

History.

1836, c. 3; R.C., c. 27; Code, s. 721; Rev., s. 1322; C.S., s. 1299; 1925, c. 251; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 121; 1997-299, s. 1; 2017-170, s. 2.

Local Modification.

Session Laws 1997-299, s. 1, repealed the local modifications to this section.

Boundaries in Gaston County.

Session Laws 2007-9, s. 1, provides: “(a) The official county lines of Gaston County, and the official township lines of the various townships in said county shall be as indicated on that certain map entitled ‘Gaston County, N. C., map of county and township lines,’ dated April, 1963, surveyed by Findlay, Witheres, McConnoughey, Inc., Registered Surveyors.

“(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the Counties of Gaston and Lincoln shall establish in accordance with

G.S. 153A-18

the line between those two counties as provided on that map, but respecting to the extent practicable the line as it has been observed in practice, provided that the line does not make any territory in one county noncontiguous to the remainder of the county. In any case where the tax treatment of a parcel has in practice been divided in some proportion between the two counties without drawing of an actual line, the two counties may divide the properties proportionally between the two counties. Until the line has been established in accordance with this subsection, the line shall continue to be administered as it has been in practice, rather than as provided by subsection (a) of this section. This subsection does not have any effect on the action of the Board of Commissioners of Gaston County in 1979 to alter the boundary between Gastonia and Southpoint Townships.”

In 2010, the General Assembly enacted Session Laws 2010-61, relating to the boundary between Alamance and Orange Counties. This act was followed in 2011 by Session Laws 2011-87 and Session Laws 2011-88, and in 2012 by Session Laws 2012-108, also dealing with the boundary between the two counties.

Specifically, Session Laws 2010-61, s. 1, provides: “The historic boundary line forming Alamance County from Orange County was described and surveyed in 1849. Over the years this line became uncertain, and so pursuant to

G.S. 153A-18(c)

entitled ‘Uncertain or Disputed Boundary,’ both county boards of commissioners passed resolutions (Alamance County, December 17, 2007, and Orange County, January 18, 2008) to request that the North Carolina Geodetic Survey (hereinafter ‘NCGS’) perform a preliminary resurvey and present a proposed map for consideration by both counties. During the 160 years since the 1849 survey, the exact location of the surveyed line has become uncertain, resulting in unintentional modifications to the boundary line affecting taxation, school attendance, zoning maps, and elections within and among Alamance County, Orange County, and the Town of Mebane.”

Session Laws 2010-61, s. 2, provides that both counties had approved the survey.

Session Laws 2010-61, s. 3, as amended by Session Laws 2011-88, s. 3, provides: “In the 160 years since the initial survey of the Alamance County/Orange County boundary line, Alamance and Orange Counties have entered into multiple taxing agreements that have resulted in properties being taxed in one county by the adjoining county. Other situations have arisen in which children of one county attend school in the adjoining county and voters in one county have voted in the adjoining county. The General Assembly recognizes the difficulties in addressing these issues and authorizes Alamance County and Orange County to maintain the current taxing, elections, education, and any other recognized government functions in place until July 1, 2012.”

Session Laws 2010-61, ss. 4 through 12, as amended by Session Laws 2011-88, ss. 4, 6 and 8, address how those government functions will be addressed after July 1, 2012.

Session Laws 2011-88, ss. 1 and 2, provide: “1. The historic boundary line forming Alamance County from Orange County was described and surveyed in 1849. In the subsequent 160 years, this line became uncertain, resulting in unintentional modifications to the boundary line affecting taxation, school attendance, zoning maps, and elections within and among Alamance County, Orange County, and the Town of Mebane, North Carolina. Pursuant to

G.S. 153A-18

, entitled “Uncertain or Disputed Boundary,” both county commissions passed resolutions (Alamance County, December 17, 2007, and Orange County, January 18, 2008) to request that North Carolina Geodetic Survey (NCGS) perform a preliminary resurvey and present a proposed map for consideration by both counties.

“2. The Alamance County Board of Commissioners agreed by vote on April 21, 2008, and Orange County on May 20, 2008, to approve authorizing NCGS to conduct the preliminary survey and the placing of monuments by NCGS consistent with their research to form a boundary baseline. On July 8, 2010, the North Carolina General Assembly enacted S.L. 2010-61, which enabled Alamance County and Orange County to transition properties between the two counties for the purpose of recommending to the North Carolina General Assembly a mutually agreed upon boundary line between the two counties.”

Session Laws 2011-88, ss. 3, 4, 6 and 8, amend Session Laws 2010-61 as noted above.

Session Laws 2011-88, s. 5(a)-(d), provides tax relief to certain property owners affected by a change in the boundary. For Section 5(a)-(d), see editor’s notes under

G.S. 105-274

and

G.S. 105-381

.

Session Laws 2011-88, ss. 7 and 9 through 12, provide: “7. The establishment of a county boundary line is, pursuant to Section 1 of Article VII of the North Carolina Constitution, the responsibility of the General Assembly. Further, it is vital to the State of North Carolina and all affected local governments that county boundary lines be fixed and any uncertainty as to the location of county boundary lines be resolved. For this reason and in the interest of justice, neither Alamance County nor Orange County, nor any agent, employee, or appointed or elected official thereof, shall be liable to any individual, group, organization, for-profit or not-for-profit business entity of any kind, or governmental entity or agency of any type or kind, for any damages, costs, fees, or fines, and no court action shall be maintained against said counties, officials, employees, and agents for any recommendation, act, failure to act, or conduct related to S.L. 2010-61 or this act and/or the adoption of a fixed boundary line separating the two counties. Except as set out in Section 5 of this act, and effective upon enactment of this act, Alamance County and Orange County and their officials, employees, and agents are released from all liability for any claims made, and no court action shall be maintained against said officials, employees, and agents for any act or failure to act pursuant to the terms of this act or S.L. 2010-61, and no further relief shall be granted or cause of action sustained except as provided herein.

“9. Except as amended by this act, S.L. 2010-61 continues in full force and effect. In the case of any conflict between this act and S.L. 2010-61, this act controls to the extent of the conflict.

“10. Pursuant to Section 1 of Article VII of the North Carolina Constitution, any boundary line between Alamance County and Orange County previously surveyed, recognized, adopted, described, utilized, or ratified is modified as set forth herein upon ratification of this act.

“11. Pursuant to Section 1 of Article VII of the North Carolina Constitution, the official boundary line between Alamance County and Orange County, as described and approved by the Alamance County Board of Commissioners at its regular meeting December 6, 2010, and the Orange County Board of Commissioners at its regular meeting December 14, 2010, is hereby formally recognized and adopted by the North Carolina General Assembly. The nine percent (9%) portion of the boundary line not described and approved by the county commissioners shall be resurveyed pursuant to separate local legislation.

“12. Upon completion of the resurveys in compliance with this act, a complete description of the resurveyed line shall be filed in the office of the Register of Deeds of Alamance County, the office of the Register of Deeds of Orange County, and the Secretary of State, as provided in

G.S. 153A-18(a)

.”

Session Laws 2011-87, s. 1, which is virtually identical to Session Laws 2011-88, s. 1, provides: “The historic boundary line forming Alamance County from Orange County was described and surveyed in 1849. In the subsequent 160 years, this line became uncertain, resulting in unintentional modifications to the boundary line affecting taxation, school attendance, zoning maps, and elections within and among Alamance County, Orange County, and the Town of Mebane, North Carolina. Pursuant to

G.S. 153A-18(a)

entitled ‘Uncertain or Disputed Boundary,’ both county boards of commissioners passed resolutions (Alamance County, December 17, 2007, and Orange County, January 18, 2008) to request that North Carolina Geodetic Survey (NCGS) perform a preliminary resurvey and present a proposed map for consideration by both counties.

“Session Laws 2011-87, ss. 2 through 4, provide: “2. The Alamance County Board of Commissioners agreed, by vote on April 21, 2008, and the Orange County Board of Commissioners on May 20, 2008, to approve authorizing NCGS to conduct the preliminary survey and the placing of monuments by NCGS consistent with their research to form a boundary baseline. On July 8, 2010, the North Carolina General Assembly enacted S.L. 2010-61, which enabled Alamance County and Orange County to transition properties between the two counties for the purpose of recommending to the North Carolina General Assembly a mutually agreed upon boundary line between the two counties.

“3. Following an extended process pursuant to the terms of S.L. 2010-61, Alamance County and Orange County have agreed upon and have recommended the General Assembly, through a separate local act, establish and adopt ninety-one percent (91%) of the boundary line separating Alamance County and Orange County.

“4. The Alamance County and Orange County Boards of Commissioners require further time to determine the most appropriate location of the final nine percent (9%) of the boundary line separating Alamance County and Orange County in order to make a final recommendation to the General Assembly. The Alamance County Board of Commissioners at its regular meeting December 6, 2010, and the Orange County Board of Commissioners at its regular meeting December 14, 2010, mutually agreed upon ninety-one percent (91%) of the boundary line. The remaining nine percent (9%) portion of the boundary line not described and approved by the county commissioners at their respective meetings December 6, 2010, and December 14, 2010, shall be resurveyed as set out in Section 5(b) of this act.”

“Session Laws 2011-87, ss. 2 through 4, provide: “2. The Alamance County Board of Commissioners agreed, by vote on April 21, 2008, and the Orange County Board of Commissioners on May 20, 2008, to approve authorizing NCGS to conduct the preliminary survey and the placing of monuments by NCGS consistent with their research to form a boundary baseline. On July 8, 2010, the North Carolina General Assembly enacted S.L. 2010-61, which enabled Alamance County and Orange County to transition properties between the two counties for the purpose of recommending to the North Carolina General Assembly a mutually agreed upon boundary line between the two counties.

“3. Following an extended process pursuant to the terms of S.L. 2010-61, Alamance County and Orange County have agreed upon and have recommended the General Assembly, through a separate local act, establish and adopt ninety-one percent (91%) of the boundary line separating Alamance County and Orange County.

“4. The Alamance County and Orange County Boards of Commissioners require further time to determine the most appropriate location of the final nine percent (9%) of the boundary line separating Alamance County and Orange County in order to make a final recommendation to the General Assembly. The Alamance County Board of Commissioners at its regular meeting December 6, 2010, and the Orange County Board of Commissioners at its regular meeting December 14, 2010, mutually agreed upon ninety-one percent (91%) of the boundary line. The remaining nine percent (9%) portion of the boundary line not described and approved by the county commissioners at their respective meetings December 6, 2010, and December 14, 2010, shall be resurveyed as set out in Section 5(b) of this act.”

Session Laws 2011-87, s. 5(a) through (c), provides: “(a) The Alamance County and Orange County Boards of Commissioners may review the remaining nine percent (9%) of the boundary separating the two counties and shall determine, in their discretion, the most appropriate location for a boundary line separating the two counties along the remaining nine percent (9%) of the boundary area. The Boards of Commissioners shall make the determination of the most appropriate location for a boundary line on or before October 31, 2011.

“(b) Alamance County and Orange County shall cause areas within the nine percent (9%) of the boundary area to be surveyed for purposes of locating a boundary line. The counties shall not be responsible for the costs of such surveys where owners of property located within the remaining nine percent (9%) of the boundary area request their property, or any portion thereof, be located within a specific county. All such surveys shall be completed by January 31, 2012. A lien in the form of a tax lien under Chapter 105 of the General Statutes may be placed on an owner’s property to recover the costs of any surveys for which the counties have advanced funds, and said lien may be enforced under the laws available for the collection of taxes. A lien for this purpose may also be placed on any property involved in a transition in whole or in part from one county to the other pursuant to S.L. 2010-61 or any other local act regarding the establishment of the Alamance County/Orange County boundary line.

“(c) The Alamance County and Orange County Boards of Commissioners shall, prior to the reconvening of the 2011 Regular Session of the General Assembly in 2012, submit a recommendation in the form of a local bill for the location of a final boundary line along the remaining nine percent (9%) of the area separating the two counties.”

Session Laws 2011-87, s. 5(d) and (e) provide for notice to property owners and an opportunity to be heard.

Session Laws 2011-87, ss. 6 and 7 provide: “6. The establishment of a county boundary line is, pursuant to Section 1 of Article VII of the North Carolina Constitution, the responsibility of the North Carolina General Assembly. Further, it is vital to the State of North Carolina and all affected local governments that county boundary lines be fixed and any uncertainty as to the location of county boundary lines be resolved. For this reason and in the interest of justice, neither Alamance County nor Orange County, nor any agent, employee, or appointed or elected official, shall be liable to any individual, group, organization, for-profit or not-for-profit business entity of any kind, of governmental entity or agency of any type or kind for any damages, costs, fees, or fines, and no court action shall be maintained against said counties, agents, employees, or officials for any recommendation, act, failure to act, or conduct related to S.L. 2010-61, any pending local bill which subsequently becomes law related to the location of the Alamance County/Orange County Boundary Line, this act, or the adoption of a fixed boundary line separating the two counties. Effective upon this act becoming law, Alamance County and Orange County, their officials, employees, and agents are released from all liability for any claims made, and no court action shall be maintained against said counties, officials, employees, and agents for any act or failure to act pursuant to the terms of this act or S.L. 2010-61, and no further relief shall be granted or cause of action sustained except as provided herein.

“7. Pending the establishment of a final boundary line separating Alamance County and Orange County, the two counties shall maintain, in the nine percent (9%) boundary area, the currently recognized boundary line for all governmental purposes, including, but not limited to, taxation, elections, emergency services, zoning, and education.”

Session Laws 2012-108, s. 1, which is also virtually identical to Session Laws 2011-87, s. 1, and Session Laws 2011-88, s. 1, provides:
“1. The historic boundary line forming Alamance County from Orange County was described and surveyed in 1849. In the subsequent 160 years, this line became uncertain, resulting in unintentional modifications to the boundary line affecting taxation, school attendance, zoning maps, and elections, within and among Alamance County, Orange County, and the Town of Mebane, North Carolina. Pursuant to

G.S. 153A-18(a)

entitled ‘Uncertain or Disputed Boundary’, both county boards of commissioners passed resolutions (Alamance County, December 17, 2007 and Orange County, January 18, 2008) to request that North Carolina Geodetic Survey perform a preliminary resurvey and present a proposed map for consideration by both counties.”

Session Laws 2012-108, ss. 2 and 3, provide: “2. In the 2011 session, the General Assembly, through S.L. 2011-88, ratified and adopted ninety-one percent (91%) of the boundary line between Alamance County and Orange County. Also in the 2011 session, the General Assembly, through S.L. 2011-87, authorized the boards of commissioners of Alamance County and Orange County to determine the most appropriate location for the remaining nine percent (9%) of the boundary line.

“3. The General Assembly recognizes the difficulties in addressing the issues associated with adopting a county boundary line and authorizes Alamance County and Orange County to maintain the current taxing, elections, education and any other recognized government functions in place in the transition areas affected by this act, if so needed, until July 1, 2013.”

Session Laws 2012-108, ss. 4 and 6 address how those government functions will be addressed after July 1, 2013.

Session Laws 2012-108, s. 5(a)-(d), provides tax relief to certain property owners affected by a change in the boundary.

Session Laws 2012-108, ss. 7 through 11, provide: “7. The establishment of a county boundary line is, pursuant to Section 1 of Article VII of the North Carolina Constitution, the sole responsibility of the General Assembly. Further, it is vital to the State of North Carolina and all affected local governments that county boundary lines be fixed and any uncertainty as to the location of county boundary lines be resolved. For this reason and in the interest of justice, neither Alamance County nor Orange County, nor any agent, employee, or appointed or elected official thereof, shall be liable to any individual, group, organization, for-profit or not-for-profit business entity of any kind, governmental entity or agency of any type or kind for any damages, costs, fees, or fines, and or court action shall be maintained against said counties, officials, employees, and agents for any recommendation, act, failure to act, or conduct related to S. L. 2010-61, S.L. 2011-88, or this act and/or the adoption of a fixed boundary line separating the two counties. Except as set out in Section 5 of this act, and effective upon this act becoming law, Alamance County and Orange County, their officials, employees, and agents are released from all liability for any claims made, and no court action shall be maintained against said officials, employees, and agents for any act or failure to act pursuant to the terms of this act, S.L. 2011-88, or S.L. 2010-61, and no further relief shall be granted or cause of action sustained except as provided herein.

“8. Should any provision of S.L. 2010-61, as amended by S.L. 2011-88, conflict with any provision of this act, the provisions of this act shall control. Should any line marking the area of the nine percent (9%) reflected in the surveys referenced herein conflict with any line shown on the surveys describing the area of the ninety-one percent (91%), the surveys marking the area of the nine percent (9%) shall control.

“9. Pursuant to Section 1 of Article VII of the North Carolina Constitution, any boundary line between Alamance County and Orange County previously surveyed, recognized, adopted, described, utilized, or ratified, save and except the ninety-one percent (91%) of the boundary line adopted by S.L. 2011-88, is modified as set forth herein upon ratification of this act.

“10. Pursuant to Section 1 of Article VII of the North Carolina Constitution, the official boundary line regarding the remaining nine percent (9%) of the line separating Alamance County and Orange County, as recommended by the Alamance County Board of Commissioners at its meeting of December 6, 2010, and the Orange County Board of Commissioners at its meeting of December 14, 2010, is hereby formally recognized and adopted by the General Assembly.

“11. Upon adoption, the survey plats reflecting the boundary line shall be filed with the Alamance County Register of Deeds, with the Orange County Register of Deeds, and in the office of the Secretary of State as provided in

G.S. 153A-18(a)

.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-170, s. 2, effective July 21, 2017, in subsection (a), substituted “the North Carolina Geodetic Survey (NCGS), on a cooperative basis, shall assist counties in defining and monumenting the location of the uncertain or disputed boundary as established in accordance with law” for “they” in the first sentence, added “Upon receiving written request from all counties adjacent to the uncertain or disputed boundary, and rewrote subsection (c).

§ 153A-19.
Establishing and naming townships.

A county may by resolution establish and abolish townships, change their boundaries, and prescribe their names, except that no such resolution may become effective during the period beginning January 1, 1998, and ending January 2, 2000, and any resolution providing that the boundaries of a township shall change automatically with changes in the boundaries of a city shall not be effective during that period. The current boundaries of each township within a county shall at all times be drawn on a map, or set out in a written description, or shown by a combination of these techniques. This current delineation shall be available for public inspection in the office of the clerk.

Any provision of a city charter or other local act which provides that the boundaries of a township shall change automatically upon a change in a city boundary shall not be effective during the period beginning January 1, 1998, and ending January 2, 2000.

The county manager or, where there is no county manager, the chairman of the board of commissioners, shall report township boundaries and changes in those boundaries to the United States Bureau of the Census in the Boundary and Annexations Survey. In responding to the surveys, each county manager or, if there is no manager, chairman of the board of commissioners shall consult with the county board of elections and other appropriate local agencies as to the location of township boundaries, so that the Census Bureau’s mapping of township boundaries does not disagree with any county voting precinct boundaries that may be based on township boundaries.

History.

1868, c. 20, s. 8; Code, s. 707; Rev., s. 1318; C.S., s. 1297; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 1987, c. 715, s. 1; c. 879, s. 2; 1993, c. 352, s. 1; 1995, c. 423, s. 4.

§ 153A-20.
Map of electoral districts.

If a county is divided into electoral districts for the purpose of nominating or electing persons to the board of commissioners, the current boundaries of the electoral districts shall at all times be drawn on a map, or set out in a written description, or shown by a combination of these techniques. This current delineation shall be available for public inspection in the office of the clerk.

History.

1973, c. 822, s. 1.

§ 153A-21.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 884.

§ 153A-22.
Redefining electoral district boundaries.

If a county is divided into electoral districts for the purpose of nominating or electing persons to the board of commissioners, the board of commissioners may find as a fact whether there is substantial inequality of population among the districts.

If the board finds that there is substantial inequality of population among the districts, it may by resolution redefine the electoral districts.

Redefined electoral districts shall be so drawn that the quotients obtained by dividing the population of each district by the number of commissioners apportioned to the district are as nearly equal as practicable, and each district shall be composed of territory within a continuous boundary.

No change in the boundaries of an electoral district may affect the unexpired term of office of a commissioner residing in the district and serving on the board on the effective date of the resolution. If the terms of office of members of the board do not all expire at the same time, the resolution shall state which seats are to be filled at the initial election held under the resolution.

A resolution adopted pursuant to this section shall be the basis of electing persons to the board of commissioners at the first general election for members of the board of commissioners occurring after the resolution’s effective date, and thereafter. A resolution becomes effective upon its adoption, unless it is adopted during the period beginning 150 days before the day of a primary and ending on the day of the next succeeding general election for membership on the board of commissioners, in which case it becomes effective on the first day after the end of the period.

Not later than 10 days after the day on which a resolution becomes effective, the clerk shall file in the Secretary of State’s office, in the office of the register of deeds of the county, and with the chairman of the county board of elections, a certified copy of the resolution.

This section shall not apply to counties where under G.S. 153A-58(3)d. or under public or local act, districts are for residence purposes only, and the qualified voters of the entire county nominate all candidates for and elect all members of the board.

History.

1981, c. 795.

Local Modification.

Dare: 1991, Ex. Sess., c. 2, ss. 4-5.1 (As to applicability and contingency provisions, see 1991 Session Laws, Ex. Sess., c. 2, s. 7); (As to subsection (e)) Carteret: 2012-58, s. 1; Stanly: 2013-361, s. 7.

§§ 153A-23,
153A-24.

Reserved for future codification purposes.